Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5126.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16r. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.356(2) Property D Larceny involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.356(3) Property E Larceny involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.356a(1) Property G Larceny from a motor vehicle 5 750.356a(2)(c) Property E Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.356a(2)(d) Property D Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.356a(3) Property G Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal causing damage 5 750.356b Property G Breaking and entering a coin telephone 4 750.356c Property E Retail fraud ? first degree 5 750.356e Property D Theft of cargo 10 750.357 Person D Larceny from the person 10 750.357a Property G Larceny of livestock 4 750.357b Property E Larceny ? stealing firearms of another 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.358 Property G Larceny from burning building 5 750.360 Property G Larceny in a building 4 750.360a(2)(b) Property F Theft detection device offense with prior conviction 4 750.361 Property H Trains ? stealing/maliciously removing parts 2 750.362 Property E Larceny by conversion involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 Property D Larceny by conversion involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.362a(2) Property D Larceny of rental property involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.362a(3) Property E Larceny of rental property involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.363 Property E Larceny by false personation involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Property D Larceny by false personation involving $20,000 or more 10 750.365 Person D Larceny from car or persons detained or injured by accident 20 750.367 Property E Larceny of trees or shrubs involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 Property D Larceny of a tree or shrub involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.367b Property E Airplanes ? taking possession 5 750.368(5) Pub ord G Preparing, serving, or executing unauthorized process ? third or subsequent offense 4 750.372 Pub ord H Running or allowing lottery 2 750.373 Pub ord H Selling or possessing lottery tickets 2 750.374 Pub ord H Lottery violations ? subsequent offense 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect 1 2 3 unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04080'25) or House Bill No. 5125 (request no. H04080'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.